New York, session 2025-2026, A5189.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 532 of the real property tax law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) All lands owned by the state, exclusive of the improvements 4 erected thereon by the state, in the city of Beacon and the town of 5 Fishkill in Dutchess county. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 7 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 8 assessment rolls prepared on the basis of taxable status dates occurring 9 on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01697-01-5